Utah statutes.
63A-2-105.   Director to approve certain purchases.

(1)  Each agency that intends to purchase any mail-related equipment or copy machine shall submit a purchase request to the director of the Division of General Services.

(2)  The director shall review those requests to ensure that:

(a)  the authority to perform those functions has been appropriately delegated to the agency under this part;

(b)  the equipment meets proper specifications; and

(c)  the benefits from the agency's purchase of the equipment outweigh the benefits of having the same functions performed by the Division of Purchasing and General Services.

